Nevada, session 83, SB144.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 281.571 is hereby amended to read as follows:
281.571 Each financial disclosure statement must contain the
following information concerning the public officer or candidate:
1. The public officer’s or candidate’s length of residence in the
State of Nevada and the district in which the public officer or
candidate is registered to vote.
-
*SB144*

– 2 –
2. Each source of the public officer’s or candidate’s income, or
that of any member of the public officer’s or candidate’s household
who is 18 years of age or older. No listing of individual clients,
customers or patients is required, but if that is the case, a general
source such as “professional services” must be disclosed.
3. A list of the specific location and particular use of real
estate, other than a personal residence:
(a) In which the public officer or candidate or a member of the
public officer’s or candidate’s household has a legal or beneficial
interest;
(b) Whose fair market value is $2,500 or more; and
(c) That is located in this State or an adjacent state.
4. The name of each creditor to whom the public officer or
candidate or a member of the public officer’s or candidate’s
household owes $5,000 or more, except for:
(a) A debt secured by a mortgage or deed of trust of real
property which is not required to be listed pursuant to subsection 3;
and
(b) A debt for which a security interest in a motor vehicle for
personal use was retained by the seller.
5. If the public officer or candidate has undertaken or attended
any educational or informational meetings, events or trips during the
immediately preceding calendar year or other period for which the
public officer or candidate is filing the financial disclosure
statement, a list of all such meetings, events or trips, including:
(a) The purpose and location of the meeting, event or trip and
the name of the organization conducting, sponsoring, hosting or
requesting the meeting, event or trip;
(b) The identity of each interested person providing anything of
value to the public officer or candidate or a member of the public
officer’s or candidate’s household to undertake or attend the
meeting, event or trip; and
(c) The aggregate value of everything provided by those
interested persons to the public officer or candidate or a member of
the public officer’s or candidate’s household to undertake or attend
the meeting, event or trip.
6. If the public officer or candidate has received any gifts in
excess of an aggregate value of $200 from a donor during the
immediately preceding calendar year or other period for which the
public officer or candidate is filing the financial disclosure
statement, a list of all such gifts, including the identity of the donor
and the value of each gift.
7. A list of each business entity with which the public officer
or candidate or a member of the public officer’s or candidate’s
household is involved as a trustee, beneficiary of a trust, director,
-
*SB144*

– 3 –
officer, owner in whole or in part, limited or general partner, or
holder of a class of stock or security [representing] issued by the
business entity that:
(a) Represents 1 percent or more of the total outstanding stock
or securities issued by the business entity [.] ; or
(b) Is valued at $5,000 or more.
8. A list of all public offices presently held by the public
officer or candidate for which this financial disclosure statement is
required.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB144*